District of Columbia statutes.
8-1771.04

New and revised standards.

The Mayor may adopt rules to establish increased efficiency standards for the products listed in § 8-1771.02 or efficiency standards for products not specifically listed in § 8-1771.02 if he or she determines that increased efficiency standards would serve to promote energy conservation in the District of Columbia; provided, that no new or increased efficiency standards shall become effective in less than one year following the adoption of the rule establishing the efficiency standard; provided further, that a substantially identical standard shall have been adopted by statute or regulation in Maryland or Virginia. The Mayor may apply for a waiver of federal preemption in accordance with federal procedures under section 325 of the Energy Policy and Conservation Act, approved December 22, 1975 (89 Stat. 923; 42 U.S.C. § 6295 ), for state efficiency standards for any product regulated by the federal government.

Dec. 11, 2007, D.C. Law 17-64, § 5, 54 DCR 10964
This section is referenced in § 8-1771.02.